apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="psycholo/g__n">
  <e>       <p><l>g</l>         <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gowi</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>giem</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gu</l>        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gu</l>        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>dzy</l>       <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gów</l>       <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gom</l>       <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gów</l>       <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gami</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gach</l>      <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dzy</l>       <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="oszu/st__n">
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sta</l>       <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stowi</l>     <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sta</l>       <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stem</l>      <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ście</l>      <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ście</l>      <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ści</l>       <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stów</l>      <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stom</l>      <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ści</l>       <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stami</l>     <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stach</l>     <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ści</l>       <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="psychiatr/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ze</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>zy</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ów</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ów</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zy</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="myśliw/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ego</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emu</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ego</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ymi</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="budownicz/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ego</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emu</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ego</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ymi</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ych</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="archeolog">       <i>archeolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="budowniczy">      <i>budownicz</i><par n="budownicz/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="chirurg">         <i>chirur</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="ginekolog">       <i>ginekolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="księgowy">        <i>księgow</i><par n="myśliw/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="mag">             <i>ma</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="myśliwy">         <i>myśliw</i><par n="myśliw/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="oszust">          <i>oszu</i><par n="oszu/st__n"/></e>
<e lm="psychiatra">      <i>psychiatr</i><par n="psychiatr/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="psycholog">       <i>psycholo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="socjolog">        <i>socjolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="zoolog">          <i>zoolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="szpieg">          <i>szpie</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="biolog">          <i>biolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
<e lm="astrolog">        <i>astrolo</i><par n="psycholo/g__n"/></e>
